phon-circumflex.xfst
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! Accept non-circumflexed versions of the vowels
!
! The vowels with circumflex î, û, â are written without circumflex
! most of the time. We optionally delete the accent from the surface.
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
regex  î (->) i,
       Î (->) İ,
       û (->) u,
       Û (->) U,
       â (->) a,
       Â (->) A
;
